Maryland, session 2026, SB0902.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(w) “Election cycle” means the period that begins on the January 1 that follows a
gubernatorial election and continues until the December 31 that is 4 years later.
13–218.
(b) (1) Assets of a campaign finance entity may be disbursed only:
(i) if they have passed through the hands of the treasurer; and
(ii) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 13–220.3 OF THIS SUBTITLE, in
accordance with the purposes of the entity.
(2) Subject to § 13–220(b)(2) and (c) of this subtitle and except as provided
in subsection (d) of this section, the treasurer shall approve all disbursements for the
campaign finance entity.
13–220.3.
(A) THE CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY OF A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY MAY MAKE A DISBURSEMENT FROM A CAMPAIGN ACCOUNT TO
REIMBURSE THE MEMBER FOR EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE MEMBER FOR THE
ACQUISITION, INSTALLATION, MAINTENANCE, OR UPGRADE OF A HOME SECURITY
SYSTEM USED AT THE MEMBER’S PRIMARY PLACE OF RESIDENCE IF THE MEMBER
SUBMITS PROOF OF THE COMPLETED WORK DURING THE MEMBER’S TERM OF
OFFICE.
(B) A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY THAT MAKES A DISBURSEMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL:

SENATE BILL 902 3
(1) SUBMIT TO THE STATE BOARD PROOF OF THE DISBURSEMENT
AND THE PROOF OF THE COMPLETED WORK THAT WAS SUBMITTED TO THE
CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY; AND
(2) MAINTAIN A RECEIPT FOR THE DISBURSEMENT.
(C) A CAMPAIGN FINANCE ENTITY MAY NOT MAKE A DISBURSEMENT UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) OF MORE THAN $1,000 DURING THE MEMBER’S TERM OF OFFICE;
OR
(2) MORE THAN ONCE DURING AN ELECTION CYCLE.
(D) THE STATE BOARD MAY AUDIT A DISBURSEMENT MADE UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) A DISBURSEMENT MADE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
NOT BE CONSIDERED TO BE AN EXPENDITURE FOR PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE.
Article – State Government
2–1805.
(A) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WHO EXPENDS PERSONAL
FUNDS ON THE ACQUISITION, INSTALLATION, MAINTENANCE, OR UPGRADE OF A
HOME SECURITY SYSTEM USED AT THE MEMBER’S PRIMARY PLACE OF RESIDENCE
MAY BE REIMBURSED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FOR THE EXPENDITURE.
(B) TO BE REIMBURSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, THE
MEMBER SHALL SUBMIT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY PROOF OF:
(1) THE EXPENDITURE OF PERSONAL FUNDS; AND
(2) THE WORK THAT WAS COMPLETED.
(C) A MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY NOT BE REIMBURSED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) FOR MORE THAN $1,000 DURING THE MEMBER’S TERM OF OFFICE;
OR
(2) MORE THAN ONCE DURING THE MEMBER’S TERM OF OFFICE.

SENATE BILL 902
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.